Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.140

Costs against guardian of infant plaintiff.

When costs are adjudged against an infant plaintiff, the guardian or person by whom he or she appeared in the action shall be responsible therefor, and payment may be enforced by execution.

[ 2011 c 336 s 126; Code 1881 s 519; 1877 p 110 s 523; 1854 p 203 s 381; RRS s 488.]